Ohio, session 136, SB180.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 5501.84 of the Revised Code be 5
enacted to read as follows: 6
Sec. 5501.84. (A) As used in this section : 7
(1) "Foreign adversary" means 8
a country listed on the registry published by the 9
secretary of state under division (C) of this section. 10
(2) "Public entity" means the state and all political 11
subdivisions of the state, including all boards, authorities, 12
commissions, agencies, committees, councils, state colleges or 13
universities, and other state entities created by the Ohio 14
Constitution or the Revised Code. 15
(3) "Small unmanned aircraft system" means a powered, 16
aerial vehicle to which all of the following apply: 17
(a) The vehicle does not carry a human operator and is 18

S. B. No. 180 Page 2
As Introduced
operated without the possibility of direct human intervention 19
from within or on the vehicle. 20
(b) The aircraft uses aerodynamic forces to provide lift. 21
(c) The vehicle can fly autonomously or be piloted 22
remotely. 23
(d) The vehicle is either expendable or recoverable. 24
"Small unmanned aircraft system" is commonly referred to 25
as a drone and does not include a satellite. 26
(B)(1) A public entity shall not purchase or otherwise 27
acquire a small unmanned aircraft system that is manufactured or 28
assembled by a foreign adversary. 29
(2) No state funds shall be used in connection with small 30
unmanned aircraft systems manufactured or assembled by a foreign 31
adversary, including state funds that are awarded through a 32
contract, grant, or cooperative agreement or that are otherwise 33
made available. 34
(3) On or after May 1, 2027, a public entity shall not 35
operate a small unmanned aircraft system manufactured or 36
assembled by a foreign adversary. 37
(C)(1) The secretary of state shall compile and update at 38
least one time every six months a registry of foreign 39
adversaries and other persons that, based on the best 40
information available to the secretary of state, constitute a 41
threat to the agricultural production, critical infrastructure, 42
security, or military defense of this state or the United 43
States. 44
(2) The registry shall be published on the secretary of 45
state's web site. 46

S. B. No. 180 Page 3
As Introduced
(3) The secretary of state shall consult all of the 47
following in compiling the registry: 48
(a) The list of persons determined by the secretary of 49
commerce of the United States to have engaged in a long-term 50
pattern or serious instances of conduct significantly adverse to 51
the national security of the United States or the security and 52
safety of United States persons and, therefore, to constitute 53
foreign adversaries for the purposes of Executive Order 13873, 54
issued by the president of the United States on May 15, 2019; 55
(b) The terrorist exclusion list compiled by the secretary 56
of state of the United States in consultation with the attorney 57
general of the United States under 8 U.S.C. 1182; 58
(c) The list of countries determined by the secretary of 59
state of the United States that have repeatedly provided support 60
for acts of international terrorism under 50 U.S.C. 4813(c) and 61
22 U.S.C. 2780(d); 62
(d) The list of individuals and entities designated by or 63
in accordance with Executive Order 13224, issued by the 64
president of the United States on September 23, 2021, or 65
Executive Order 13268, issued by the president of the United 66
States on July 2, 2002. 67
(4) The secretary of state shall not include on the 68
registry any person that does not appear on at least one of the 69
federal lists described in division (C)(3) of this section. 70